Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-148
Agriculture and mechanic arts; appropriation and use of money received.

All money received by the State Treasurer, or other state officer, in pursuance and by virtue of the said Act of Congress, is specifically appropriated and set apart solely for the more complete endowment, support and maintenance of the college for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts existing in this state under the provisions of an Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and designated by law as the Industrial College of the University of Nebraska. All of the money shall be immediately paid over by the treasurer to the authorities of the college designated in section 85-149, without further warrant or authority than is contained herein.

Laws 1891, c. 52, § 2, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 7133;

C.S.1922, § 6765;

C.S.1929, § 85-151;

R.S.1943, § 85-148.